Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting special or local laws chartering insurance companies, see art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.

As to Uniform Simultaneous Death Act, see §§

2-13-101

through

2-13-107

.

As to applicability of Uniform Simultaneous Death Act to contracts of insurance, see §

2-13-102

.

For provision that felonious taking of life precludes insurance benefits, see §

2-14-101

.

As to arson caused to collect insurance, see §§

6-3-101

,

6-3-102

.

For provisions as to professional liability insurance for peace officers, see §

9-2-1017

.

For provision authorizing department heads of the state to obtain group insurance plans for department employees, see §

9-3-201

.

For provisions as to state employees' group health insurance, see §§

9-3-202

through

9-3-218

.

For provision requiring insurance on stored grain, see §

11-11-112

.

For authority of cities and towns to carry liability insurance, see §

15-1-104

.

For provision that benefits paid under policemen's or fireman's pension funds shall remain suspended during the receipt of worker's compensation or insurance, see §§

15-5-208

,

15-5-313

.

As to use of insurance money for rebuilding state structures, see §

16-6-109

.

As to liability insurance covering school vehicles, see §

21-3-126

.

As to accident insurance for pupils, see §

21-3-127

.

For provisions authorizing school districts to obtain liability insurance, see §

21-3-128

.

As to school district obtaining insurance from companies authorized to do business in the state, see §

21-3-130

.

For provision authorizing school districts to provide insurance benefits for teachers and other employees, see §

21-7-301

.

As to Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Act generally, see chapter 9 of title 31.

As to uninsured motorist coverage, see chapter 10 of title 31.

As to Motor Club Services Act, administered by the insurance commissioner, see chapter 14 of title 31.

For duty of department of transportation to require motor carriers to deposit with it policies of insurance or other securities, see §

31-18-209

.

For provision as to powers and duties of custodian of life insurance policies under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, see §

34-13-125

.

For Uniform Commercial Code provisions as to cost of goods, insurance and freight, see § 34.1-2-320.

As to warehouseman's lawful claims for insurance on goods deposited, see § 34.1-7-209.

For provision as to hospital procuring liability insurance, see §

35-2-114

.

For provision as to inapplicability of the Uniform Consumer Credit Code to the sale of insurance, see §

40-14-121

.

As to insurance generally under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code, see §§

40-14-401

through

40-14-453

.

For provision as to discovery of insurance agreements, see Rule 26, W.R.C.P.

As to form of complaint on insurance policy under Rules of Civil Procedure, see Form 17, Appx. of Forms, W.R.C.P.

Revision of title. —

Ch. 190, Laws 1983, revised this title, generally amending, renumbering and repealing the provisions thereof. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1983 act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt they would be helpful. See the Tables of Comparative Sections in Volume 11.

Section 2, ch. 190, Laws 1983, reads: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Sections 1 to 672, ch. 136, Laws 1967, also revised title 26, amending, renumbering and repealing the provisions thereof.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 1997, ch. 120, § 3, effective July 1, 1997, provides: “The amendments made by this act to the Wyoming health insurance pool are intended to provide an acceptable alternative mechanism meeting the requirements of section 2744 of the federal Public Health Service Act and the requirements of the federal Health Insurance Portability Act of 1996. The governor shall advise the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services that the state has enacted necessary legislation to provide for the implementation of an acceptable alternative mechanism designed to meet those requirements.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance § 1 et seq.

Policies as contracts in writing within statute of limitations, 3 ALR2d 809.

Insurer's demand for additional or corrected proof of loss as waiver or estoppel as to right to assert contractual limitation provision, 15 ALR2d 955.

Repayment or tender of unearned premium as condition precedent to exercise by insurer of right to cancel policy, 16 ALR2d 1200.

Avoidance of release of claim for personal injuries on ground of misrepresentation as to matters of law by tort-feasor or his representative insurer, 21 ALR2d 272.

Fraud or misrepresentation by insured's agent after loss as within provision avoiding policy for fraud or attempted fraud of insured, 24 ALR2d 1220.

Insurer's waiver of or estoppel to assert contractual limitation provision, 29 ALR2d 636.

Applicability of contractual limitation of time to action to recover unearned premium retained by insurer upon cancelation of policy, 29 ALR2d 938.

Rights and remedies arising out of delay in passing upon application for insurance, 32 ALR2d 487.

Effective date of insurance policy as between premium date stated in policy and later date either of approval, acceptance or delivery of policy or of payment of premium, 44 ALR2d 472, 37 ALR3d 933.

Denial of liability as waiver of proofs of loss required by insurance policy, 49 ALR2d 161.

Receipt of check for insurance premium as preventing forfeiture for nonpayment, 50 ALR2d 630.

Injunction to prevent insured from settling suit against wrongdoer to detriment of insurer, 51 ALR2d 697.

Consideration for rider, endorsement or other modification of insurance policy to change risks covered, 52 ALR2d 826.

Time for payment of insurance premium where last day falls on Sunday or holiday, 53 ALR2d 877.

Payments on other than annual basis as satisfying provision for increase of insurance benefits based on payment of premiums in advance, 83 ALR2d 696.

Insurers' denial of renewal of policy, 85 ALR2d 1410.

What amounts to contest within contemplation of incontestable clause, 95 ALR2d 420.

Doctrine of estoppel or waiver as available to bring within coverage of insurance policy risks not covered by its terms or expressly excluded therefrom, 1 ALR3d 1139.

Choice of law in construction of insurance policy originally governed by law of one state as affected by modification, renewal, exchange, replacement or reinstatement in another state, 3 ALR3d 646.

Insurance agent's statement or conduct indicating that insurer's cancellation of policy shall not take effect as binding on insurer, 3 ALR3d 1135.

Insurer's acceptance of defaulted premium payment or defaulted premium note as affecting liability for loss which occurred during period of default, 7 ALR3d 414.

Dividends as preventing lapse of policy for nonpayment of premiums, 8 ALR3d 862.

Clause requiring notice of claim within specified time or as soon as reasonably possible or the like, 17 ALR3d 530.

Insurer's statements as to amount of dividends, accumulations, surplus or the like as binding on insurer or merely illustrative, 17 ALR3d 777.

Construction of express insurance policy provision restricting insurer's right to cancel or otherwise terminate coverage, 19 ALR3d 1429.

Incontestable clause as affected by reinstatement of policy, 23 ALR3d 743.

What constitutes “serious illness,” “serious disease” or equivalent language used in insurance application, 28 ALR3d 1255.

Notice or proof of loss under one policy as notice or proof of loss under another provision of same policy or another policy issued by same insurer, 29 ALR3d 856.

Reformation of insurance policy to correctly identify risks and causes of loss, 32 ALR3d 661.

Validity and construction of statutes relating to style or prominence with which provisions must be printed in insurance policy, 36 ALR3d 464.

Insurer's tort liability of acts of adjuster seeking to obtain settlement or release, 39 ALR3d 739.

Insurer's failure to pay amount of admitted liability as precluding reliance on statute of limitations, 41 ALR3d 1111.

Person to whom renewal premium may be paid or tendered so as to bind insurer, 42 ALR3d 751.

Conclusiveness of recitation, in delivered insurance policy, that initial premium has been paid, 44 ALR3d 1361.

Construction and effect of arrangement under which insurance premiums are paid automatically via insurer's draft on insured's bank account, 45 ALR3d 1349.

Insurer's liability for consequential or punitive damages for wrongful delay or refusal to make payments due under contracts, 47 ALR3d 314.

Materiality and effect of false statement by insurance applicant as to previous insurance cancellations or rejections, 66 ALR3d 749.

Right of insured under individual policy to coverage afforded by group policy from which he directly transferred on termination of his employment, 66 ALR3d 1192.

Risks and causes of loss covered or excluded by aviation liability policy, 86 ALR3d 118.

Insured's right to recover attorneys' fees incurred in declaratory judgment action to determine existence of coverage under liability policy, 87 ALR3d 429.

What constitutes operating, riding in, or descending from, aircraft within life or accident policy provisions relating to aeronautics, 88 ALR3d 1064.

Performance by one insurer of its duty to defend as excusing failure of other insurers equally obligated to defend, 90 ALR3d 1199.

When does statute of limitations begin to run upon an action by subrogated insurer against third-party tort-feasor, 91 ALR3d 844.

Liability insurance coverage as extending to liability for punitive or exemplary damages, 16 ALR4th 11.

Allocation of defense costs between primary and excess insurance carriers, 19 ALR4th 107.

Liability of premium finance agency to insurer for consequences of ineffectual cancellation of policy, 26 ALR4th 346.

Event as occurring within period of coverage of “occurrence” and “discovery” or “claims made” liability policies, 37 ALR4th 382.

Necessity or permissibility of naming no-fault insurer as defendant where insured automobile owner or operator is not liable for economic losses under no-fault insurance law, 40 ALR4th 858.

Actual receipt of cancellation notice mailed by insurer as prerequisite to cancellation of insurance, 40 ALR4th 867.

Motorist having “no-fault” insurance affording no liability coverage in circumstances as “uninsured” or “underinsured” motorist under damaged party's insurance, 40 ALR4th 1202.

Statutory or policy exclusion, from automobile no-fault coverage, of property damage covered by homeowner's policy of household member who is owner, registrant or operator of vehicle involved, 41 ALR4th 973.

Construction and effect of provisional or monthly reporting inventory insurance, 81 ALR4th 9.

Liability of insurer, or insurance agent or adjuster, for infliction of emotional distress, 6 ALR5th 297.

Insurer's liability to insurance agent or broker for damages suffered as result of insurer's denial of coverage or refusal to pay policy proceeds to insured, 6 ALR5th 611.

Admissibility of polygraph or similar lie detector test results, or willingness to submit to test, on issues of coverage under insurance policy, or insurer's good-faith belief that claim was not covered, 7 ALR5th 143.

Validity of state statute prohibiting health providers from the practice of waiving patients' obligation to pay health insurance deductibles or copayments, or advertising such practice, 8 ALR5th 855.

Prospective juror's connection with insurance company as ground for challenge for cause, 9 ALR5th 102.

Validity, construction, and effect of “regulatory exclusion” in directors' and officers' liability insurance policy, 21 ALR5th 292.

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage: validity, construction, and effect of policy provision purporting to reduce coverage by amount paid or payable under workers' compensation law, 31 ALR5th 116.

Availability of interpleader under Federal Interpleader Acts and Rule 22 of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure to insurance company for resolving dispute as to insurance policy, 19 ALR Fed 166.

What constitutes impairment of proposed intervenor's interest to support intervention as matter of right under Rule 24(a)(2) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure in actions involving insurance, 75 ALR Fed 869.

Construction and application of preemption exemption, under Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 USC § 1001 et seq.), for state laws regulating insurance, banking or securities (29 USC § 1144(b)(2)), 87 ALR Fed 797.

Exemption or immunity from federal antitrust liability under McCarran-Ferguson Act (15 USC §§ 1011-1013) and state action and Noerr-Pennington Doctrines for business of insurance and persons engaged in it, 116 ALR Fed 163.

44 C.J.S. Insurance § 1 et seq.